District of Columbia statutes.
42-2201

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Fund” means the Senior Citizens’ Home Repair and Improvement Program Fund established by § 42-2202.

(4)

“Lower income” means a household within the Section 8 lower income guidelines established by the Secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1437f.

(5)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(6)

“Principal place of residence” means a dwelling unit in which a person lives in a particular locality with the intent to make it a fixed and permanent home of the senior citizen.

(7)

“Senior citizen homeowner” means the owner resident of residential real property who is 60 years of age or older.

Mar. 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-96, § 2, 35 DCR 891
1981 Ed., § 45-3001.